en: semolina, semolina wheat
bg: грис
ca: Sèmola
cs: Krupice
da: semulje
de: Grieß
el: Σιμιγδάλι
es: Sémola
et: Manna
fi: suurimo
fr: Semoule
hr: griz
hu: dara, gríz
it: Semolina
ja: セモリナ
lt: manų kruopos
lv: manna
nb: semulegryn, semule
nl: gries
oc: Semola
pl: semolina, semoliny
pt: Sêmola
ru: манная крупа, крупа манная
sv: mannagryn, semolinagryn

en: semolina flour, semolina wheat flour
bg: брашно от грис, грисово брашно
de: Grießmehl
es: harina de sémola
fr: farine de semoule
hr: griz brašno
it: farina di semola
pl: mąka pszenna semolina

en: wheat semolina, Suji, Sooji, rava
ar: سميد
bg: пшеничен грис
ca: semola de blat
cs: pšeničná krupice
de: Weizengrieß, Weizengriess
el: σιμιγδάλι σίτου
es: sémola de trigo, semolina de trigo
fi: mannasuurimo, vehnäsuurimo
fr: semoule de blé
hr: pšenični griz
hu: búzadara
it: semolino di frumento
lt: kviečių manų kruopos, kvietiniai manų kruopos, kvietinės manų kruopos, kvietinis manų kruopos
nl: tarwegries, tarwegriesmeel
pt: sêmola de trigo
sl: pšenični zdrob
sv: mannagryn av vete, vetegryn

fr: semoule de blé tendre
it: granito di grano tenero
nl: zachte tarwegriesmeel

en: semolina blend
hr: žličnjaci od griza
it: miscela di semola

en: Couscous, cous cous
ar: كسكس
be: Кус-кус
bg: Кускус, Кус-кус
bm: Basi
bn: কুসকুস
br: Kouskous
ca: cuscús
cs: kuskus
da: Couscous
de: Couscous, Cous Cous
el: Κουσκούς
eo: Kuskuso
es: cuscús
et: Kuskuss
eu: Kus-kus
fa: کوسکوس
fi: kuskus, couscous
fr: couscous, cous cous
gl: Cuscús
he: קוסקוס
hr: kus-kus
hu: kuszkusz
hy: Կուսկուս
id: Couscous
io: Kuskuso
it: cuscus, cous cous
ja: クスクス
ko: 쿠스쿠스
lb: Couscous
lt: Kuskusas
ms: Kuskus
nb: couscous
nl: couscous
oc: couscous
pl: Kuskus, kuskus pszenny, kasza kuskus, kasza kuskus z pszenicy
pt: cuscuz
ro: Cuș cuș
ru: Кускус
sl: Kuskus
sv: Couscous
ta: cous cous
tl: Kuskus
tr: Kuskus
tt: күскүс
uk: Кус-кус
wa: Couscousse
zh: 古斯米

en: bulgur, bulgur wheat, bulgar
xx: bulgur
ar: برغل
az: bulqur
be: булгур
bg: булгур
de: Bulgur, Bulgurweizen
el: πλιγούρι
eo: bulguro
fa: بلغور
fi: bulgur, bulgurvehnä
fr: boulghour, boulgour
he: בורגול
hi: दलिया
hr: bulgur
hu: bulgur, török rizs, tört búza
hy: բլղուր
it: bulgur
ja: ブルグル
kk: булгур
ko: 불구르
ku: savar
la: purgurium
mk: булгур
pl: kasza bulgur
pt: bulgur, triguilho
ru: булгур
uk: булгур
zh: 布格麦

en: wheat bulgur
fr: boulgour de blé
hr: pšenični bulgur
it: grano bulgur

en: whole wheat bulgur, wholewheat bulgur, wholemeal wheat bulgur
fr: boulgour de blé complet
hr: bulgur od cijelog zrna pšenice
it: grano bulgur integrale, grano integrale bulgur

en: durum wheat bulgur
fr: boulgour de blé dur
hr: bulgur od durum pšenice
it: grano duro bulgur
pl: kasza bulgur z pszenicy durum, kasza bulgur z pszenicy twardej, bulgur z pszenicy durum

en: emmer, emmer wheat
ar: قمح ثنائي الحبة
bg: Двузърнест лимец
ca: pisana
cv: Пăри
da: Emmer
de: Emmer
el: Δίκοκκο σιτάρι
es: trigo farro, farro
fa: گندم دودانه
fi: emmervehnä
fr: blé amidonnier, amidonnier
hi: खपली गेहूँ
hr: emmer
hu: tönkebúza, tönke, emmer, emmer búza
hy: Հաճար
it: grano farro, farro dicocco, farro, emmer
ja: エンマーコムギ
ka: ასლი
la: Triticum dicoccum
ml: എമ്മെർ
nl: Emmertarwe
nn: Emmer
os: Уасылы
pl: Pszenica płaskurka
pt: farro
ru: двузернянка, Пшеница двузернянка
sv: Emmervete
tr: Kavılca buğdayı
uk: Полба
zh: 二粒小麦

en: emmer flour, emmer wheat flour
fr: farine de blé amidonnier
hr: emmer brašno
it: farina di farro, farina di grano farro

en: barley
am: ገብስ
an: hordio
ar: شعير
ay: siwara
az: arpa, adi arpa
ba: арпа
be: ячмень звычайны
bg: ечемик, ечемичен
bn: যব
bo: ནས།
br: heiz
bs: ječam
ca: ordi
ce: мукх
cs: ječmen, jecmen
cv: урпа
cy: haidd
da: byg
de: Gerste, Gersten
dv: ހިމަ ގޮދަން
el: κριθάρι
eo: hordeo
es: cebada
et: oder, odra
eu: garagar
fa: جو
fi: ohra, ohraa, ohrasta
fr: orge
ga: eorna
gl: cebada
gv: oarn
he: שעורה תרבותית
hi: जौ
hr: ječam, ječmene, ječmena trava, ječma
ht: òj
hu: árpa
hy: սովորական գարի
id: jelai
ii: ꌿ
io: hordeo
is: bygg
it: orzo
ja: オオムギ, 大麦
jv: juwawut
ka: სათესი ქერი
kk: кәдімгі арпа, Kädimgi arpa, كادىمگى ارپا
kn: ಬಾರ್ಲಿ
ko: 보리
ky: арпа
li: gaes
lt: miežiai, miežių, miežinio, miežinis
lv: mieži, miežu
mk: јачмен
ml: യവം
mn: арвай
ms: barli
mt: barli
my: မုယော
nb: bygg
ne: जौ
nl: gerst
nn: bygg
oc: òrdi
or: ଯଅ
os: сиск
pa: ਜੌਂ
pl: jęczmień, jęczmienny, jęczmienna, jęczmienne, jęczmiennego, jęczmiennej, jęczmiennych, jęczmienia
pt: cevada
qu: siwara
ro: orz
ru: ячмень
sa: यवः
sh: ječam
sk: jačmeň
sl: ječmen
sn: bhari
so: heed
sq: elbi
sr: јечам, Ječam
sv: korn
sw: shayiri
ta: வாற்கோதுமை
te: బార్లీ
tg: ҷав
th: ข้าวบาร์เลย์, บาร์เลย์
tk: арпа
tl: sebada
tr: arpa
tt: арпа
ug: ئارپا
uk: ячмінь
ur: جو
uz: arpa
vi: đại mạch
wa: oidje
yi: גערשט
za: mienhhaeux
zh: 大麦

en: organic barley
bg: био ечемик
da: økologisk byg
de: Bio-Gerste
es: cebada orgánica
fi: luomuohra
hr: organski ječam, eko ječam
hu: bio árpa
it: orzo biologico
nl: biologische gerst
nn: økologisk bygg
pt: cevada orgânica

en: sprouted barley
bg: прораснал ечемик
da: spiret byg
de: gekeimte Gerste
es: cebada germinada
fi: idätetty ohra
fr: orge germée
hr: proklijali ječam
hu: csíráztatott árpa
it: orzo germogliato
nl: gekiemde gerst
nn: spiret bygg
pl: jęczmień kiełkowany, kiełki jęczmienia
pt: cevada germinada

en: wholemeal barley
bg: пълнозърнест ечемик
da: fuldkornsbyg
de: Vollkorngerste
es: cebada integral
fi: täysjyväohra
fr: orge complète
hr: integralni ječam
hu: teljes kiőrésű árpa
it: orzo integrale
nl: volkorengerst
nn: fulkornsbygg
pl: jeçzmień z pełnego przemiału, jęczmienne pełnoziarniste
pt: cevada integral

en: barley flakes
bg: ечемичени люспи, люспи от ечемик
cs: ječné vločky
de: Gerstenflocken
es: copos de cebada
fi: ohrahiutale
fr: flocons d'orge, flocon d'orge
hr: ječmene pahuljice, pahuljice od ječmena
hu: árpapehely
it: fiocchi d'orzo
nl: gerstvlokken, gerstevlokken
pl: płatki jęczmienne
ro: fulgi de orz
ru: хлопья ячменные
sv: kornflingor

en: whole grain barley flakes, wholegrain barley flakes
de: Vollkorn-Gerstenflocken, Vollkorngerstenflocken, Gerstenvollkornflocken
fi: täysjyväohrahiutale, täysjyväohrahiutaleet
fr: flocons d'orge complète, flocons d'orge complets
hr: ječmene pahuljice od cijelog zrna
it: fiocchi d'orzo integrale
nl: volkoren gerstvlokken
sv: fullkornskornflingor

en: barley groats
az: arpa yarması
cs: ječné kroupy
de: Rollgerste
eo: hordea grio
fi: ohrasuurimo
fy: grôt
he: גריסים
hr: ječmena prekrupa, ječmena kaša
it: chicchi d'orzo
ko: 보리쌀
nl: gort
pl: kasza jęczmienna, kaszy jęczmiennej
pt: cevadinha
ro: arpacș de orz
sl: ješprenj
tr: gevrek arpa

en: hulled barley
hr: oljušteni ječam
it: orzo decorticato
pl: kasza pęczak, pęczak